Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5653.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 11-47-11 of the General Laws in Chapter 11-47 entitled "Weapons"
is hereby amended to read as follows:
11-47-11. License or permit to carry concealed pistol or revolver.
(a) The licensing authorities of any city or town shall, upon application of any person
twenty-one (21) years of age or over having a bona fide residence or place of business within the
city or town, or of any person twenty-one (21) years of age or over having a bona fide residence
within the United States and a license or permit to carry a pistol or revolver concealed upon his or
her person issued by the authorities of any other state or subdivision of the United States, issue a
license or permit to the person to carry concealed upon his or her person a pistol or revolver
everywhere within this state for four (4) years from date of issue, if it appears that the applicant has
good reason to fear an injury to his or her person or property or has any other proper reason for
carrying a pistol or revolver, and that he or she is a suitable person to be so licensed. Said licensing
authorities are prohibited from imposing additional or stricter requirements than those imposed by
the department of attorney general or any other fee than that required by § 11-47-12. The license
or permit shall be in triplicate in form to be prescribed by the attorney general and shall bear the
fingerprint, photograph, name, address, description, and signature of the licensee and the reason
given for desiring a license or permit and in no case shall it contain the serial number of any firearm.
The original shall be delivered to the licensee. Any member of the licensing authority, its agents,
servants, and employees shall be immune from suit in any action, civil or criminal, based upon any

official act or decision, performed or made in good faith in issuing a license or permit under this
chapter.
(b) Notwithstanding any other chapter or section of the general laws of the state of Rhode
Island, the licensing authority of any city or town shall not provide or release to any individual,
firm, association or corporation the name, address, or date of birth of any person who has held or
currently holds a license or permit to carry a concealed pistol or revolver. This section shall not be
construed to prohibit the release of any statistical data of a general nature relative to age, gender
and racial or ethnic background nor shall it be construed to prevent the release of information to
parties involved in any prosecution of § 11-47-8 or in response to a lawful subpoena in any criminal
or civil action which the person is a party to that action.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001908
========
LC001908 - Page 2 of 3